Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/es_ANY.dic
comentar/REDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÍÎÜ
quedar/REDÂÃÅÆÜñòôø
reclamar/REDÀÃÄÅÆÜñò
